Louisiana, session 2026, HB626.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1819 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1819. Public postsecondary education institution suicide prevention initiatives
A.(1) Each public postsecondary education institution shall post on its
website the following information:
(a) The National Suicide Prevention Lifeline hotline number, "988", with an
explanation that this number may be called or texted.
(b) A local suicide prevention hotline number, if available, and a state
suicide prevention hotline number, if available.
(2) Each public postsecondary education institution shall have printed on
student identification cards the information provided in Subparagraphs (1)(a) and (b)
of this Subsection.
B. Each public postsecondary education institution shall implement the
following suicide prevention initiatives:
(1) Provide each entering full-time, part-time, undergraduate, graduate, and
professional student, including transfer students, information about available mental
health and suicide prevention services and early warning signs for a person who may
be considering suicide. The information may be provided through a live presentation
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 626 ENROLLED
or a format that allows student interaction, including an online program or video, and
shall not be provided in a paper format only.
(2) Provide that individuals with training and experience in mental health
issues who focus on reducing student suicides and attempted suicides are available
on campus or remotely by telephone or other means for students twenty-four hours
a day, seven days a week.
C.(1) Each public postsecondary education institution shall develop and
implement a system for collecting and reporting data on suicide risk assessments
conducted by that institution. The data collected shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The total number of suicide risk assessments conducted annually.
(b) Demographic information, including race, ethnicity, and gender.
(c) The number of students referred to mental health services as a result of
the assessments.
(2) All data collected and reported shall be aggregated and nonidentifiable,
ensuring that individual students cannot be personally identified.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.